District of Columbia statutes.
2-1510

Budget request.

The Department of Recreation shall develop an annual fiscal year budget request to administer and support programs of the neighborhood planning councils; such budget requests shall be submitted to the neighborhood planning councils each year for their review and comment. The budget shall be submitted by the Mayor to the Council, accompanied by such comments, on such date which may be required to conform with the District of Columbia budget schedule.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-93, § 11, 23 DCR 9532b
1981 Ed., § 1-2610.
1973 Ed., § 6-2010.
Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the “Department of Recreation” renamed the “Department of Recreation and Parks” shall be known as the “Department of Parks and Recreation.”